Washington statutes.
RCW 35.71.060

Financing methods.

The corporate authority may finance the establishment of a mall, including, but not limited to, right-of-way improvements, traffic control devices, and off-street parking facilities in the vicinity of the mall, by one or more of the following methods or by a combination of any two or more of them:

(1) By creating local improvement districts under the laws applicable thereto in Title 35 RCW.

(2) By issuing revenue bonds pursuant to chapter 35.41 RCW, *RCW 35.24.305, chapter 35.92 RCW, RCW 35.81.100, and by such other statutes that may authorize such bonds.

(3) By issuing general obligation bonds pursuant to chapter 39.52 RCW, RCW 35.81.115, and by such other statutes and applicable provisions of the state Constitution that may authorize such bonds.

(4) By use of gifts and donations.

(5) General fund and other available moneys: PROVIDED, That if any general fund moneys are expended for a mall, provision may be made for repayment thereof to the general fund from money received from the financing of the mall.

The corporate authority may include within the cost of any mall project the expense of moving utilities, or any facility located within a right-of-way.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.71.060. Prior: 1961 c 111 s 6.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 35.24.305 was recodified as RCW 35.23.454 pursuant to 1994 c 81 s 90.